Maryland, session 2025, HB1305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Consortium on Coordinated Community Supports shall convene a
stakeholder workgroup to examine whether the framework established by the Consortium
for the creation of coordinated community supports partnerships for the awarding of grants
to providers for the provision of community behavioral health services in local school
systems is effective in granting awards to community providers that meet the needs
determined by a local school system and whether grant awards are distributed equitably
across the State.
(b) The workgroup shall consist of the following members:
(1) the Chair of the Consortium on Coordinated Community Supports;
(2) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(3) the Chair of the Accountability and Implementation Board, or the
Chair’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1305*

HOUSE BILL 1305
(4) one representative each from a small, midsized, and large local school
system; and
(5) any other members as determined by the Chair of the Consortium.
(c) The workgroup shall:
(1) analyze the effectiveness of the community supports partnerships pilot
hub model in matching community behavioral health service providers with the needs of
local school systems as determined by a local school system;
(2) examine reports of grantees on key performance measures to determine
whether grantees are providing services that have anticipated behavioral health outcomes;
(3) review existing requirements for provider and Consortium
collaboration with local school systems to determine whether the service needs of every
local school system are being acknowledged and considered in the awarding of grants; and
(4) review all the grants awarded by the Consortium in February 2024 to
determine whether the number and amount of grants awarded were equitably distributed
throughout the State.
(d) On or before December 1, 2025, the workgroup shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Consortium on Coordinated Community Supports may not award any
grant funding for fiscal year 2026 under § 7–447.1 of the Education Article.
(b) The Consortium may resume awarding grants for fiscal year 2027 if the report
of the workgroup under Section 1 of this Act finds that:
(1) the pilot hub model is an effective method for organizing community
supports partnerships because it successfully matches community behavioral health
service providers to the needs determined by local school systems; and
(2) the grants awarded by the Consortium are equitably distributed
throughout the State to meet the needs of all school children and their families in every
local school system.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.